Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 22.8. Clean Energy Manufacturing Incentive Grant Program.

§§ 59.1-284.25 through 59.1-284.27.

Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 761, cl. 4.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 59.1-284.25 through 59.1-284.27, which established the Clean Energy Manufacturing Incentive Grant Program, derived from 2011, cc. 815, 864.